Maine, session 132, LD871.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §30 is enacted to read:
§30. Prohibition on COVID-19 vaccination
A department, agency, official, agent or employee of the State may not require a person
to receive a vaccine designed to increase an individual's immunity against or prevent
coronavirus disease 2019, also known as COVID-19.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §802, sub-§4-B, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. An individual may not be required to receive a vaccine designed to increase an
individual's immunity against or prevent coronavirus disease 2019, also known as
COVID-19.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §84-B is enacted to read:
§84-B. Prohibition on COVID-19 vaccination
The board or commissioner may not require a person licensed under this chapter to
receive a vaccine designed to increase an individual's immunity against or prevent
coronavirus disease 2019, also known as COVID-19.